Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE H. DISTRICTS GOVERNING GROUNDWATER

CHAPTER 8833. GUADALUPE COUNTY GROUNDWATER CONSERVATION DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8833.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Guadalupe County Groundwater Conservation District.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 70 (S.B. 1147), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2013.

Sec. 8833.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a groundwater conservation district in Guadalupe County created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 70 (S.B. 1147), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2013.

Sec. 8833.003. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC USE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 70 (S.B. 1147), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2013.

Sec. 8833.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district is composed of the territory described by Section 3, Chapter 1066, Acts of the 75th Legislature, Regular Session, 1997, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J, Chapter 36, Water Code; or

(2) other law.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 70 (S.B. 1147), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8833.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD; SINGLE-MEMBER DISTRICTS; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of seven directors elected from single-member districts determined by the Guadalupe County Commissioners Court.

(b) Section 36.059(b), Water Code, does not apply to the district.

(c) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 70 (S.B. 1147), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2013.

Sec. 8833.052. ELECTION DATE. On the uniform election date in November of each odd-numbered year, the district shall hold an election in the district to elect the appropriate number of directors.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 70 (S.B. 1147), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2013.

Sec. 8833.053. QUALIFICATIONS FOR ELECTION. To be qualified to be elected as a director, a person must be a registered voter in the single-member district that the person would represent.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 70 (S.B. 1147), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8833.101. GROUNDWATER CONSERVATION DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. Except as provided by Section 8833.102, the district has the rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapters 36 and 49, Water Code, applicable to groundwater conservation districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 70 (S.B. 1147), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2013.

Sec. 8833.102. LIMITATIONS ON DISTRICT POWERS. The district may not impose:

(1) a tax; or

(2) a fee on a well used exclusively for domestic or livestock watering purposes.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 70 (S.B. 1147), Sec. 1.03, eff. April 1, 2013.